Nebraska, session 109, LB838A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $523,247 from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $136,300 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 838, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $99,500 for FY2026-27 or
$102,500 for FY2027-28.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-